Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 2 Composition of House of Representatives
22-2-2.
Districts.

The state is hereby divided into seventy-five (75) representative districts bounded and described as follows:

It is understood and intended that for the purpose of this section a line described as running on, on, to or through any street (including road, avenue, lane, way, parkway, expressway, divided Highway, state route or interstate route, or trail), stream or river, is intended to mean the centerline of that street, stream or river, and a line described as the shoreline is intended to mean the line on the mean low water level, and a feature extension is intended to mean the imaginary straight-line extension from the end of a map feature, usually a street or road, to another feature as for example, from the end of a dead-end street to a nearby river, in all instances, unless the same shall be otherwise specified.

It is further understood and intended that for the purpose of this section, the districts described in this section shall be composed of United States census geography (tracts and blocks), as defined by the 2020 version of the “TIGER” files from the United States Census Bureau, whose boundaries correspond to the below metes and bounds set forth in this section and hereby made a part of this chapter. A listing of which census blocks are contained within each district shall be deemed to be incorporated by reference.

It is further understood and intended that for the purpose of this section, the districts will be depicted on thirty-nine (39) maps known as House Plan D — Substitute A, compiled by Election Data Services, Inc. for each city and town, and hereinafter may be referred to as town maps.

The secretary of state shall keep a copy of each set of the foregoing maps and a copy of the census tract and block listing available for inspection during ordinary business hours at his or her office. The secretary of state shall furnish each city and town a copy of the town map covering that particular city or town within ten (10) days from the date of passage of this act.

For purposes of this title, references to “tract” or “CT” shall mean “census tract,” as that demographic unit is established by the United States Bureau of the census for the 2020 census as described by maps and publications of the bureau. References to “block,” “blocks,” or “block groups,” refer to those demographic units as established by the United States Census Bureau for the 2020 census as described by maps and publications of the bureau.

Any reference to a “city or town,” “city or town boundaries,” or “city or town limits” shall refer to the boundaries or limits of the particular city or town as defined by the 2020 version of the “TIGER” files from the United States Census Bureau.

In the census tract and block listing, the first two (2) digits of a census description shall refer to the State of Rhode Island (44), the next three (3) digits of a census description shall refer to the county in which the district lies. Bristol county carries the code 001; Kent county carries the code 003; Newport county carries the code 005; Providence county carries the code 007 and Washington county carries the code 009. The next six (6) digits refer to the census tract within the county set forth in the description. The last four (4) digits refer to the census block within the census tract. “TIGER” is an acronym for the computer readable geographic data base that automates the mapping and related geographic activities required to support the United States’ Census Bureau’s census and survey programs and stands for “Topologically Integrated Geographic Encoding and Referencing.”

If any census tract, block, block group, or enumeration district is omitted, listed more than once, or is only partially provided for, it is intended that the districts be defined in such a manner as to not omit any area of Rhode Island from a district and to comply with the standard of Articles VII and VIII of the Rhode Island Constitution requiring that districts be reasonably equal. In order to carry out the intent of the general assembly as expressed in this section the secretary of state, shall if necessary, undertake measures to insure compliance with this section.

In the event of a discrepancy between the metes and bounds description, the description by census tracts and blocks, and the maps which shall be on file with the secretary of state, then the listing of census tracts and blocks shall take precedence and be controlling

First district:
The first representative district shall consist of all that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Power St and S Main St; thence easterly on Power St to Cooke St; thence northerly on Cooke St to Angell St; thence easterly on Angell St to River Rd; thence southerly on River Rd to the Henderson Expressway; thence easterly on the Henderson Expressway to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the line extending from Irving Ave; thence westerly on Irving Ave to Gulf Ave; thence northwesterly on Gulf Ave to Loring Ave; thence westerly on Loring Ave to Grotto Ave; thence northerly on Grotto Ave to Laurel Ave; thence westerly on Laurel Ave to Arlington Ave; thence northwesterly on Arlington Ave to Olney St; thence westerly on Olney St to N Main St; thence northerly on N Main St to Hewes St; thence southwesterly on Hewes St to Stevens St; thence westerly on Stevens St to Charles St; thence southerly on Charles St to the Moshassuck River; thence southerly on the Moshassuck River to Smith St; thence westerly on Smith St to New York New Haven and Hartford RR; thence northerly on New York New Haven and Hartford RR to I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to Smith St; thence easterly on Smith St to Francis St; thence southerly on Francis St to Gaspee St; thence easterly on Gaspee St to the Providence Amtrak Station; thence southeasterly on the eastern boundary line of the Providence Amtrak Station to Railroad St; thence southeasterly on Railroad St to Park Row W; thence easterly on Park Row W to Park Row; thence easterly on Park Row to N Main St; thence southerly on N Main St to S Main St; thence southeasterly on S Main St to the point of origin.

Second district:
The second representative district shall consist of all of the part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Smith St and Orms St; thence westerly on Orms St to Valley St; thence southwesterly on Valley St to Pleasant Valley Pkwy; thence southeasterly on Pleasant Valley Pkwy to Dean St; thence southerly on Dean St to State Highway 10; thence easterly on State Highway 10 to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to I-195; thence easterly on I-195 to the Providence River; thence southeasterly on the Providence River to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the Henderson Expressway; thence westerly on Henderson Expressway to River Rd; thence northerly on River Rd to Angell St; thence westerly on Angell St to Cooke St; thence southerly on Cooke St to Power St; thence westerly on Power St to S Main St; thence northwesterly on S Main St to N Main St; thence northwesterly on N Main St to Park Row; thence westerly on Park Row to Park Row W; thence westerly on Park Row W to Railroad St; thence northwesterly on Railroad St to the Providence Amtrak Station; thence northwesterly on the eastern boundary line of the Providence Amtrak Station to Gaspee St; thence southwesterly on Gaspee St to Francis St; thence northwesterly on Francis St to Smith St; thence westerly on Smith St to the point of origin.

Third district:
The third representative district shall consist of all that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Valley St and Raymond St; thence northeasterly on Valley St to Orms St; thence easterly on Orms St to Smith St; thence southeasterly on Smith St to I-95; thence northerly on I-95 to the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line to Smithfield Ave; thence southerly on Smithfield Ave to Silver Spring St; thence southerly on Silver Spring St, to Ledge St; thence westerly on Ledge St to Charles St; thence northerly on Charles St to Paul St; thence westerly on Paul St to Aventine Ave; thence southerly on Aventine Ave to Greeley St; thence southeasterly on Greeley St to Opper St; thence southwesterly on Opper St to Branch Ave; thence northwesterly on Branch Ave to Moy St; thence southerly on Moy St to Concannon St; thence westerly on Concannon St to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to Veazie St; thence southerly on Veazie St to Eva St; thence southerly on Eva St to Admiral St; thence easterly on Admiral St to Douglas Ave; thence southerly on Douglas Ave to Eaton St; thence westerly on Eaton St to Oakland Ave; thence southerly on Oakland Ave to Raymond St; thence southeasterly on Raymond St to the point of origin.

Fourth district:
The fourth representative district shall consist of all that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line and I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to New York New Haven and Hartford RR; thence southeasterly on New York New Haven and Hartford RR to Smith St; thence easterly on Smith St to the Moshassuck River; thence northerly on the Moshassuck River to Charles St; thence northerly on Charles St to Stevens St; thence easterly on Stevens St to Hewes St; thence northerly on Hewes St to N Main St; thence southerly on N Main St to Olney St; thence easterly on Olney St to Arlington Ave; thence southeasterly on Arlington Ave to Laurel Ave; thence northeasterly on Laurel Ave to Grotto Ave; thence southerly on Grotto Ave to Loring Ave; thence easterly on Loring Ave to Gulf Ave; thence southeasterly on Gulf Ave to Irving Ave; thence easterly on Irving Ave and its extension to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifth district:
The fifth representative district shall consist of all that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Smith St and Oakland Ave; thence northerly on Oakland Ave to Eaton St; thence easterly on Eaton St to Douglas Ave; thence northerly on Douglas Ave to Admiral St; thence westerly on Admiral St to Eva St; thence northerly on Eva St to Veazie St; thence northwesterly on Veazie St to Douglas Ave; thence northwesterly on Douglas Ave to Concannon St; thence easterly on Concannon St to Moy St; thence northerly on Moy St to Branch Ave; thence easterly on Branch Ave to Opper St; thence northeasterly on Opper St to Greeley St; thence northwesterly on Greeley St to Aventine Ave; thence northerly on Aventine Ave to Paul St; thence easterly on Paul St to Charles St; thence southerly on Charles St to Ledge St; thence northeasterly on Ledge St to Silver Spring St; thence northerly on Silver Spring St to Smithfield Ave; thence northerly on Smithfield Ave to the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line to the North Providence — Pawtucket boundary line; thence westerly and southwesterly on the North Providence — Providence boundary line to Admiral St; thence southeasterly on Admiral St to Sharon St; thence southerly on Sharon St to La Salle Dr; thence easterly on La Salle Dr to census block 440070024002020; thence continuing northerly, easterly and southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070024002020 — 440070024002018 and 440070024002020 — 440070024002023 to Joy St; thence easterly on Joy St to River Ave; thence southerly on River Ave to Smith St; thence southeasterly on Smith St to the point of origin.

Sixth district:
The sixth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Hannah St and Atwells Ave; thence westerly on Atwells Ave to Manton Ave; thence westerly on Manton Ave to Rushmore Ave; thence northerly on Rushmore Ave to Actina St; thence easterly on Actinia St to Imera St; thence northerly on Imera St to the eastern boundary line of Triggs Memorial Golf Course; thence northerly on the eastern boundary line of Triggs Memorial Golf Course to Galileo Ave; thence northeasterly on Galileo Ave to Standish Ave; thence northerly on Standish Ave to Rialto St; thence easterly on Rialto St to Mount Pleasant Ave; thence northerly on Mount Pleasant Ave to the northern boundary line of census block 440070024006022; thence easterly on the northern boundary line of census block 440070024006022 to Elmcroft Ave; thence easterly on Elmcroft Ave to Whitford Ave; thence easterly on Whitford Ave to Academy Ave; thence northerly on Academy Ave to Smith St; thence southeasterly on Smith St to River Ave; thence northerly on River Ave to Joy St; thence westerly on Joy St to census block 440070024002020; thence northerly, westerly and southerly on the boundary line of census block 440070024002020 to La Salle Dr; thence westerly on La Salle Dr to Sharon St; thence northerly on Sharon St to Admiral St; thence northwesterly on Admiral St to the North Providence — Providence boundary line; thence southwesterly on the North Providence boundary line to the Johnston — Providence boundary line and the Woonasquatucket River; thence southeasterly and easterly on the Woonasquatucket River to census block 440070019003012; thence northeasterly from the point of the Woonasquatucket River and census block 440070019003012 to the line extending from the eastern segment of Bosworth St; thence northeasterly on Bosworth St to Curtis St; thence northwesterly on Curtis St to the western segment of Bosworth St; thence northeasterly on Bosworth St to Manton Ave; thence northwesterly on Manton Ave to Steere Ave; thence northeasterly on Steere Ave to Amherst St; thence westerly on Amherst St to Hannah St; thence northerly on Hannah St to the point of origin.

The sixth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Providence bounded by a line beginning at the North Providence — Providence boundary line and Hillside Dr; thence westerly on Hillside Dr to Longwood Ave; thence northwesterly on Longwood Ave to Woodbine St; thence northerly on Woodbine St to Sherman Ave; thence westerly on Sherman Ave to High Service Ave; thence northerly on High Service Ave to Superior View Blvd; thence westerly on Superior View Blvd to Lookout Ave; thence southerly on Lookout Ave to Smith St; thence southeasterly on Smith St to Homewood Ave; thence southerly on Homewood Ave to Olney Ave; thence westerly on Olney Ave to Belcourt Ave; thence southerly on Belcourt Ave to the northern boundary line of Rhode Island College; thence westerly on the northern boundary line of Rhode Island College to Fruit Hill Ave; thence southwesterly on Fruit Hill Ave to Lyman Ave; thence westerly on Lyman Ave to Woonasquatucket Ave; thence northwesterly on Woonasquatucket Ave to Testa Dr; thence westerly on Testa Dr and its extension to the Johnston — North Providence boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Johnston — North Providence boundary line to the North Providence — Providence boundary line; thence northeasterly on the North Providence — Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Seventh district:
The seventh representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Atwells Ave and Academy Ave; thence northerly on Academy Ave to Kepler St; thence easterly on Kepler St to census block 440070022003011; thence northerly and easterly on the northern boundary line of census block 440070022003011 to Allston St; thence northerly on Allston St to census block 440070022002014; thence northerly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440070022003000 to Allston St; thence northeasterly on Allston St to Harold St; thence northerly on Harold St to Berkley St; thence northeasterly on Berkley St to River Ave; thence northwesterly on River Ave to Chalkstone Ave; thence northeasterly on Chalkstone Ave to Rosebank Ave; thence northwesterly on Rosebank Ave to Pleasant Valley Pkwy; thence westerly on Pleasant Valley Pkwy to census block 440070023002007; thence northerly on the western boundary line of census block 440070023002002 to Smith St; thence northwesterly on Smith St to Academy Ave; thence southerly on Academy Ave to Whitford Ave; thence westerly on Whitford Ave to Elmcroft Ave; thence westerly on Elmcroft Ave to census block 440070024006018; thence westerly on the northern boundary line of census block 440070024006022 to Mount Pleasant Ave; thence southerly on Mount Pleasant Ave to Rialto St; thence westerly on Rialto St to Standish Ave; thence southerly on Standish Ave to Galileo Ave; thence westerly on Galileo Ave to the eastern boundary line of Triggs Memorial Golf Course; thence southwesterly on the eastern boundary line of Triggs Memorial Golf Course to Imera St; thence southerly on Imera St to Actina St; thence westerly on Actinia St to Rushmore Ave; thence southerly on Rushmore Ave to Manton Ave; thence easterly on Manton Ave to Atwells Ave; thence easterly on Atwells Ave to the point of origin.

Eighth district:
The eighth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Oakland Ave and Smith St; thence northwesterly on Smith St to census block 440070023002000; thence southerly and easterly on the western boundary line of census block 440070023002002 to Pleasant Valley Pkwy; thence easterly on Pleasant Valley Pkwy to Rosebank Ave; thence southeasterly on Rosebank Ave to Chalkstone Ave; thence westerly on Chalkstone Ave to River Ave; thence southeasterly on River Ave to Berkley St; thence southwesterly on Berkley St to Harold St; thence southerly on Harold St to Allston St; thence southerly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440070022003000 to Allston St; thence southerly on Allston St to census block 440070022003011; thence westerly and southerly on the northern boundary line of census block 440070022003011 to Kepler St; thence westerly on Kepler St to Academy Ave; thence southerly on Academy Ave to Atwells Ave; thence westerly on Atwells Ave to Hannah St; thence southerly on Hannah St to Amherst St; thence easterly on Amherst St to Pope St; thence southerly on Pope St to Kossuth St; thence easterly on Kossuth St to Bowdoin St; thence southerly on Bowdoin St to Appleton St; thence northwesterly on Appleton St to Julian St; thence southwesterly on Julian St to Manton Ave; thence southeasterly on Manton Ave to Olneyville Sq; thence southerly on Olneyville Sq to Westminster St; thence easterly on Westminster St to I-95; thence northerly on I-95 to State Highway 10; thence westerly on State Highway 10 to Dean St; thence northerly on Dean St to Pleasant Valley Pkwy; thence northwesterly on Pleasant Valley Pkwy to Raymond St; thence northwesterly on Raymond St to Oakland Ave; thence northerly on Oakland Ave to the point of origin.

Ninth district:
The ninth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Manton Ave and San Souci Dr; thence southerly on Manton Ave to Olneyville Sq; thence southerly on Olneyville Sq to Westminster St; thence easterly on Westminster St to I-95; thence southeasterly on I-95 to Point St; thence westerly on Point St to Prairie Ave; thence southerly on Prairie Ave to Blackstone St; thence westerly on Blackstone St to Friendship St; thence southwesterly on Friendship St to Broad St; thence northerly on Broad St to Trinity Sq; thence southwesterly on Trinity Sq to Elmwood Ave; thence southwesterly on Elmwood Ave to Arch St; thence westerly on Arch St to Gilmore St; thence southerly on Gilmore St to Wilson St; thence westerly on Wilson St to Harrison St; thence southerly on Harrison St to Sprague St; thence westerly on Sprague St to Diamond St; thence northerly on Diamond St to Hollis St; thence westerly on Hollis St to Parade St; thence northerly on Parade St to Chapin Ave; thence westerly on Chapin Ave to Messer St; thence southerly on Messer St to Wendell St; thence westerly on Wendell St to Service Rd 1; thence southerly on Service Rd 1 to Union Ave; thence westerly on Union Ave to State Highway 10; thence southerly on State Highway 10 to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence northwesterly and westerly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to Webster Ave; thence northerly on Webster Ave to Magnolia St; thence easterly on Magnolia St to Judith St; thence northwesterly on Judith St to US Highway 6 on-ramp; thence westerly on US Highway 6 on-ramp to Plainfield St; thence southwesterly on Plainfield St to Gifford St; thence northerly on Gifford St to Whittier Ave; thence westerly on Whittier Ave to Heath St; thence northerly on Heath St to Eastwood Ave; thence westerly on Eastwood Ave to Laurel Hill Ave; thence northerly on Laurel Hill Ave to Hartford Ave; thence westerly on Hartford Ave to Flower St; thence northerly on Flower St to Dresser St; thence northwesterly on Dresser St to Merino Park; thence northerly and westerly on the southern boundary line of Merino Park to Melissa St; thence northerly on Melissa St to Merino Park; thence northerly on the western boundary line of Merino Park to the Woonasquatucket River; thence southeasterly and easterly on the Woonasquatucket River to census block 440070019003012; thence northeasterly from the point of the Woonasquatucket River and census block 440070019003012 to the line extending from the eastern segment of Bosworth St; thence northeasterly on Bosworth St to Curtis St; thence northwesterly on Curtis St to the western segment of Bosworth St; thence northeasterly on Bosworth St to Manton Ave; thence northwesterly on Manton Ave to Steere Ave; thence northeasterly on Steere Ave to Amherst St; thence easterly on Amherst St to Pope St; thence southerly on Pope St to Kossuth St; thence easterly on Kossuth St to Bowdoin St; thence southerly on Bowdoin St to Appleton St; thence northwesterly on Appleton St to Julian St; thence southwesterly on Julian St to Manton Ave; thence southeasterly on Manton Ave to the point of origin.

Tenth district:
The tenth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Dexter St and Sprague St; thence westerly on Sprague St to Diamond St; thence northerly on Diamond St to Hollis St; thence westerly on Hollis St to Parade St; thence northerly on Parade St to Chapin Ave; thence westerly on Chapin Ave to Messer St; thence southerly on Messer St to Wendell St; thence westerly on Wendell St to Service Rd 1; thence southerly on Service Rd 1 to Union Ave; thence westerly on Union Ave to State Highway 10; thence southerly on State Highway 10 to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence southerly, easterly and northerly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to Montgomery Ave; thence westerly on Montgomery Ave to Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd; thence northwesterly on Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd to census block 440070001024000; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070001024000 — 440070001024001 and 440070001024000 — 440070001024002 to Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd; thence southwesterly on Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd to Linden Ave; thence westerly on Linden Ave to Elmwood Ave; thence northerly on Elmwood Ave to Bellevue Ave; thence westerly on Bellevue Ave to Bucklin St; thence northerly on Bucklin St to Dexter St; thence northerly on Dexter St to the point of origin.

Eleventh district:
The eleventh representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Elmwood Ave and Broad St; thence southeasterly on Broad St to Montgomery Ave; thence westerly on Montgomery Ave to Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd; thence northwesterly on Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd to census block 440070001024000; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070001024000 — 440070001024001 and 440070001024000 — 440070001024002 to Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd; thence southwesterly on Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd to Linden Ave; thence northwesterly on Linden Ave to Elmwood Ave; thence northerly on Elmwood Ave to Bellevue St; thence westerly on Bellevue St to Bucklin St; thence northerly on Bucklin St to Dexter St; thence northerly on Dexter St to Sprague St; thence easterly on Sprague St to Harrison St; thence northerly on Harrison St to Wilson St; thence easterly on Wilson St to Gilmore St; thence northerly on Gilmore St to Arch St; thence easterly on Arch St to Elmwood Ave; thence northerly on Elmwood Ave to the point of origin.

Twelfth district:
The twelfth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Prairie Ave and Point St; thence southerly on Prairie Ave to Blackstone St; thence westerly on Blackstone St to Friendship St; thence southerly on Friendship St to Broad St; thence southerly on Broad St to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence easterly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the Providence River; thence northerly on the Providence River to US Highway 6; thence westerly on US Highway 6 to Point St; thence westerly on Point St to the point of origin.

Thirteenth district:
The thirteenth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Johnston — Providence boundary line and Plainfield St; thence northeasterly on Plainfield St to Murray St; thence southeasterly on Murray St to Pocasset Ave; thence southwesterly on Pocasset Ave to Hillhurst Ave; thence easterly on Hillhurst Ave to Laurel Hill Ave; thence northerly on Laurel Hill Ave to Shafter St; thence easterly on Shafter St to Terrace Ave; thence southerly on Terrace Ave to the Cranston — Providence boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — Providence boundary line to Webster Ave; thence northerly on Webster Ave to Magnolia St; thence easterly on Magnolia St to Judith St; thence northwesterly on Judith St to US Highway 6 on-ramp; thence westerly on US Highway 6 on-ramp to Plainfield St; thence southwesterly on Plainfield St to Gifford St; thence northerly on Gifford St to Whittier Ave; thence westerly on Whittier Ave to Heath St; thence northerly on Heath St to Eastwood Ave; thence westerly on Eastwood Ave to Laurel Hill Ave; thence northerly on Laurel Hill Ave to Hartford Ave; thence westerly on Hartford Ave to Flower St; thence northerly on Flower St to Dresser St; thence northwesterly on Dresser St to Merino Park; thence northerly and westerly on the southern boundary line of Merino Park to Melissa St; thence northerly on Melissa St to Merino Park; thence northerly on the western boundary line of Merino Park to the Woonasquatucket River; thence northwesterly on Woonasquatucket River to the Johnston — Providence boundary line; thence westerly and southerly on the Johnston — Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirteenth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Johnston bounded by a line beginning at the Johnston — Providence boundary line and Plainfield St; thence southwesterly on Plainfield St to Morgan Ave; thence westerly on Morgan Ave to School St; thence southerly on School St to census block 440070125001021; thence westerly and northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070125001021 — 440070125001009, 440070125001021 — 440070125001024 and 440070125001013 — 440070125001014, to Morgan Ave and Downing Dr; thence northerly on Downing Dr to Central Ave; thence northeasterly on Central Ave to Alden St; thence northwesterly on Alden St to Boundary Ave; thence easterly on Boundary Ave to Harding Ave; thence northerly on Harding Ave to York Rd; thence easterly on York Rd to census block 440070124021024; thence northerly and easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070124021024 — 440070124021025 and 440070124021024 — 440070124021027 to the Johnston — Providence boundary line; thence southerly on the Johnston — Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Fourteenth district:
The fourteenth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at Park Ave and Cranston St; thence northerly on Cranston St to Randall St; thence westerly on Randall St to Atwood Ave; thence northerly on Atwood Ave to Walnut Grove Ave; thence westerly on Walnut Grove Ave to Elena St; thence westerly on Elena St to Yard St; thence northerly on Yard St to Cannon St; thence westerly on Cannon St to Royal Ave; thence northerly on Royal Ave to Atwood Ave; thence westerly on Atwood Ave to the Johnston — Cranston boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Johnston — Cranston boundary line to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence easterly and southerly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to Frankfurt St; thence southwesterly on Frankfort St to Speck Ave; thence westerly on Speck Ave to Hornbine St; thence northwesterly on Hornbine St to Gleason St; thence westerly on Gleason St to Midwood St; thence southerly on Midwood St to Harmon Ave; thence northwesterly and northeasterly on Harmon Ave to Wayne Ave; thence northeasterly on Wayne Ave to Burnham Ave; thence northwesterly on Burnham Ave to Washington Secondary Trail; thence southwesterly on Washington Secondary Trail to Park Ave; thence westerly on Park Ave to the point of origin.

The fourteenth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Johnston — Providence boundary line and Plainfield St; thence northeasterly on Plainfield St to Murray St; thence southeasterly on Murray St to Pocasset Ave; thence southwesterly on Pocasset Ave to Hillhurst Ave; thence easterly on Hillhurst Ave to Laurel Hill Ave; thence northerly on Laurel Hill Ave to Shafter St; thence easterly on Shafter St to Terrace Ave; thence southerly on Terrace Ave to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence westerly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the Johnston — Providence boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Johnston — Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifteenth district:
The fifteenth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Johnston — Cranston boundary line and Comstock Pkwy; thence southerly on Comstock Pkwy to S Comstock Pkwy; thence southerly on S Comstock Pkwy to census block 440070145012036; thence southwesterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070145012036 — 440070145012014 and 440070145012036 — 440070145012037 to 440070145013004; thence southerly and southwesterly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440070145013004 to Furnace Hill Brook; thence southeasterly on Furnace Hill Brook to census block 440070145013048; thence southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070145013048 — 440070145013025 to Hope Rd; thence southwesterly on Hope Rd to Burlingame Rd; thence easterly on Burlingame Rd to Lippitt Brook; thence southerly on Lippitt Brook to the Cranston — Coventry boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — Coventry boundary line to the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to Pontiac Ave; thence northerly on Pontiac Ave to East St; thence southwesterly on East St to Foster Rd; thence northwesterly on Foster Rd to West Rd; thence northeasterly on West Rd to Keene Ave; thence northwesterly on Keene Ave to census block 440070142002014; thence southwesterly, northwesterly, and northeasterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070142002014 — 440070142002011 to Howard Ave; thence northwesterly on Howard Ave to New London Ave; thence northeasterly on New London Ave to State Highway 37; thence westerly on State Highway 37 to Washington Secondary Trail; thence northerly on Washington Secondary Trail to Dean St; thence westerly on Dean St to the eastern boundary line of Meshanticut Park; thence northerly on the eastern boundary line of Meshanticut Park to Curtis St; thence westerly on Curtis St to Phenix Ave; thence southerly on Phenix Ave to I-295; thence northwesterly on I-295 to Meshanticut Brook; thence easterly on Meshanticut Brook to census block 440070148002024; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070148002024 — 440070148002027, 440070148002024 — 440070148002025, 440070148002025 — 440070148002014 and 440070148002025 — 440070148002011 to the Johnston — Cranston boundary line; thence westerly on the Johnston — Cranston boundary line to the point of origin.

Sixteenth district:
The sixteenth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Cranston — Warwick boundary line and State Highway 37; thence westerly on State Highway 37 to Pontiac Ave; thence northerly on Pontiac Ave to Sockanosset Cross Rd; thence northwesterly on Sockanosset Cross Rd to New London Ave; thence northerly on New London Ave to Reservoir Ave; thence northeasterly on Reservoir Ave to Leyden St; thence westerly on Leyden St to Capital Way; thence northerly on Capital Way to Park Ave; thence westerly on Park Ave to Washington Secondary Trail; thence northeasterly on Washington Secondary Trail to Burnham Ave; thence southeasterly on Burnham Ave to Wayne Ave; thence southwesterly on Wayne Ave to Harmon Ave; thence southerly and southeasterly on Harmon Ave to Midwood St; thence northerly on Midwood St to Gleason St; thence easterly on Gleason St to Hornbine St; thence southeasterly on Hornbine St to Speck Ave; thence easterly on Speck Ave to Frankfurt St; thence northeasterly on Frankfort St to the Cranston — Providence boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Cranston — Providence boundary line to Reservoir Ave; thence southwesterly on Reservoir Ave to Park Ave; thence southeasterly on Park Ave to Pontiac Ave; thence southwesterly and southerly on Pontiac Ave to Hodsell St; thence easterly on Hodsell St to Arthur St; thence southeasterly on Arthur St to Doric Ave; thence northerly on Doric Ave to Laurens St; thence easterly on Laurens St to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence westerly and southwesterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Seventeenth district:
The seventeenth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at State Highway 37 and New London Ave; thence southwesterly on New London Ave to Howard Ave; thence southeasterly on Howard Ave to census block 440070142002014; thence southwesterly, southeasterly and northeasterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070142002014 — 440070142002011 to Keene Ave; thence southeasterly on Keene Ave to West Rd; thence southwesterly on West Rd to Foster Rd; thence southeasterly on Foster Rd to East St; thence northeasterly on East St to Pontiac Ave; thence northeasterly on Pontiac Ave to census block 440070142002029; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070142002028 — 440070142002029, 440070142002019 — 440070142002021, 440070142002008 — 440070142002009 to State Highway 37; thence easterly on State Highway 37 to Pontiac Ave; thence northerly on Pontiac Ave to Sockanosset Cross Rd; thence northwesterly on Sockanosset Cross Rd to New London Ave; thence northerly on New London Ave to Reservoir Ave; thence northeasterly on Reservoir Ave to Leyden St; thence westerly on Leyden St to Capital Way; thence northerly on Capital Way to Park Ave; thence westerly on Park Ave to Cranston St; thence northerly on Cranston St to Randall St; thence westerly on Randall St to Atwood Ave; thence northerly on Atwood Ave to Walnut Grove Ave; thence westerly on Walnut Grove Ave to Elena St; thence westerly on Elena St to Village Ave; thence northwesterly on Village Ave to Harcourt St; thence southwesterly on Harcourt St to Marlow St and census block 440070148003010; thence westerly and southerly on the northern and western boundary line of census block 440070148003010 to census block 440070148003022; thence westerly on the northern boundary line of census blocks 440070148003022 and 440070148003032 to Arrow Way; thence southerly on Arrow Way to Scituate Ave; thence westerly on Scituate Ave to I-295; thence southeasterly on I-295 to Phenix Ave; thence northerly on Phenix Ave to Curtis St; thence easterly on Curtis St to the eastern boundary line of Meshanticut Park; thence southerly on the eastern boundary line of Meshanticut Park to Dean St; thence easterly on Dean St to Washington Secondary Trail; thence southerly on Washington Secondary Trail to State Highway 37; thence easterly on State Highway 37 to the point of origin.

Eighteenth district:
The eighteenth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Cranston — Warwick boundary line and I-95; thence northeasterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to Warwick Ave; thence northeasterly on Warwick Ave to Norwood Ave; thence northeasterly on Norwood Ave to Narragansett Bay and the Cranston — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Cranston — East Providence boundary line to the Cranston — Providence boundary line; thence westerly, southerly and northerly on the Cranston — Providence boundary line to Reservoir Ave; thence southwesterly on Reservoir Ave to Park Ave; thence southeasterly on Park Ave to Pontiac Ave; thence southwesterly and southerly on Pontiac Ave to Hodsell St; thence easterly on Hodsell St to Arthur St; thence southeasterly on Arthur St to Doric Ave; thence northerly on Doric Ave to Laurens St; thence easterly on Laurens St to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to the point of origin.

Nineteenth district:
The nineteenth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at the Cranston — Warwick boundary line and Warwick Ave; thence southwesterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to Cranberry Bog Brook; thence southerly on Cranberry Bog Brook to Pawtuxet Ave; thence easterly on Pawtuxet Ave to George St; thence southerly on George St to Post Rd; thence northeasterly on Post Rd to Atlantic Ave; thence easterly on Atlantic Ave to Warwick Ave; thence southerly on Warwick Ave to Spring Green Pond; thence easterly on the unnamed river from Spring Green Pond to Narragansett Bay and the Warwick — East Providence boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Warwick — East Providence boundary line to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

The nineteenth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Cranston — Warwick boundary line and Warwick Ave; thence northeasterly on Warwick Ave to Norwood Ave; thence northeasterly on Norwood Ave to Narragansett Bay and the Cranston — East Providence boundary line; thence southerly on the Cranston — East Providence boundary line to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Twentieth district: